test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VII_N_CNJ_maajiigin_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VII - VV - maajiigin :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	obv     prt     dub
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 260)
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     maajiigin+VII+Cnj+0: maajiiging
     maajiigin+VII+Cnj+0+4: maajiigninig 

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     maajiigin+VII+Cnj+0+Prt: maajiigngiba #cons
     #maajiigin+VII+Cnj+0+Prt: maajiiggiba #book (ngn -> g!)
     maajiigin+VII+Cnj+0+4+Prt: maajiignin'giba #'

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     PV/CCNJ+maajiigin+VII+Cnj+0+Dub: myaajiignogwenh #changed conjunct...
     PV/CCNJ+maajiigin+VII+Cnj+0+4+Dub: myaajiignin'gwenh #'

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     maajiigin+VII+Cnj+0+Prt+Dub: maajiignogbane 
     maajiigin+VII+Cnj+0+4+Prt+Dub: maajiignin'gobne #'

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0: maajiignzinog 
     maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4: maajiignzinoonig #cons
     #maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4: maajiignzinnig #book alternate

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+Prt: maajiignzinoogba
     maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4+Prt: maajiignzinoon'giba #'cons
     #maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4+Prt: maajiignznoon'giba #'book

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     PV/CCNJ+maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+Dub: myaajiignzinoogwenh #changed conjunct expected
     #maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+Dub: maajiignzinoogwenh #non-changed conjunct book
     PV/CCNJ+maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4+Dub: myaajiignzinoon'gwenh #'changed conjunct expected
     #maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4+Dub: maajiigzinnin'gwenh #'non-changed conjunct book
     #maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4+Dub: maajiigzinoon'gwenh #'non-changed conjunct book

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+Prt+Dub: maajiignzinoogbane 
     maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4+Prt+Dub: maajiignzinoon'gobne  #'cons
     #maajiigin+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4+Prt+Dub: majiignzinnin'gobne #'book (odd!)
